North Dakota, session 69, SB2148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 4.1-75-06 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The amount reimbursablereimbursed under this section must be deducted from the
proceeds of the estray's sale. Any amount remaining thereafterafter the sale must be
forwardedreported to the North Dakota stockmen's association and submitted to the
state treasurer for deposit in the North Dakota stockmen's association
fund administrator of the state abandoned property office under chapter 47 - 30.2 .
Page No. 1 25.0570.01000